Utah statutes.
26-21-26.   General acute hospital to report prescribed controlled substance poisoning or overdose.

(1)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, if a person who is 12 years of age or older is admitted to a general acute hospital for poisoning involving a prescribed controlled substance, the general acute hospital shall, within three business days after the day on which the person is admitted, send a written report to the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, created in Section 58-1-103, that includes:

(a)  the patient's name;

(b)  each drug or other substance found in the person's system that may have contributed to the poisoning or overdose, if known; and

(c)  the name of each person who the general acute hospital has reason to believe may have prescribed a controlled substance described in Subsection (1)(b) to the person, if known.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed as creating a new cause of action.



Enacted by Chapter 290, 2010 General Session

